New York, session 2025-2026, S786.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public 2 health law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the 3 public health law relating to establishing a drug-induced movement 4 disorder screening education program, as proposed in legislative bills 5 numbers S. 8965-A and A. 6799-B, is amended to read as follows: 6 (h) [The department shall develop and conduct a program concerning 7 drug-induced] Drug-induced movement disorders[. Such program shall 8 include but not be limited to, (i) educational information on], includ- 9 ing the importance of screening for and identifying symptoms of drug-in- 10 duced movement disorders[; and (ii) the development and dissemination of 11 educational materials for healthcare providers regarding], treatment for 12 drug-induced movement disorders, [including for services provided via 13 telehealth. Such] and information on methods by which the stigma expe- 14 rienced by people living with drug-induced movement disorders related to 15 the treatment of mental health conditions may be reduced or eliminated. 16 Any such educational materials disseminated to healthcare providers 17 shall be developed [and] in consultation with the commissioner of the 18 office of mental health, disseminated by the department in coordination 19 with relevant healthcare provider groups, and shall include best prac- 20 tices for the treatment and screening of movement disorders informed by 21 the American Psychiatric Association and other professional society 22 practice guidelines. [Such program shall also include education and 23 outreach on the elimination of stigma for people living with drug-in- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02693-01-5 S. 786 2 1 duced movement disorders related to the treatment of mental health 2 conditions.] 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 4 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public health law 5 relating to establishing a drug-induced movement disorder screening 6 education program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8965-A 7 and A. 6799-B, takes effect.